Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.312

Rules coordinator.

Each agency shall designate a rules coordinator, who shall have knowledge of the subjects of rules being proposed or prepared within the agency for proposal, maintain the records of any such action, and respond to public inquiries about possible, proposed, or adopted rules and the identity of agency personnel working, reviewing, or commenting on them. The office and mailing address of the rules coordinator shall be published in the state register at the time of designation and maintained thereafter on the code reviser website for the duration of the designation. The rules coordinator may be an employee of another agency.

[ 2007 c 456 s 4; 2003 c 246 s 4; 1993 c 202 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2003 c 246: See note following RCW 34.05.362.

Finding—Intent—1993 c 202: See note following RCW 34.05.310.